Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1129
Reference by consent; when allowed.

All or any of the issues in the action, whether of fact or law or both, may be referred to a referee upon the written consent of the parties or upon their oral consent in court entered upon the record.

R.S.1867, Code § 298, p. 444;

R.S.1913, § 7867;

C.S.1922, § 8812;

C.S.1929, § 20-1129;

R.S.1943, § 25-1129;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 10;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 15.

A referee's factual findings are entitled to some deference, but no such deference is owed to the referee's conclusions or recommendations. Becher v. Becher, 299 Neb. 206, 908 N.W.2d 12 (2018).

The question of the defendant's agency was within the issue of receivership and therefor within the authority given the referee, and the filing of a supplemental report which recommended appointment of a receiver was proper in this case. Beavers v. Graham, 209 Neb. 556, 308 N.W.2d 826 (1981).

Special master appointed by court is a referee. Gentsch, Inc. v. Burnett, 173 Neb. 820, 115 N.W.2d 446 (1962).

Supreme Court has inherent power to refer original cases. State ex rel. Broatch v. Moores, 56 Neb. 1, 76 N.W. 530 (1898).

Party participating in proceedings before referee is estopped to deny consent to reference. Morris v. Haas, 54 Neb. 579, 74 N.W. 828 (1898).

Court will presume consent was given to action to a referee when record fails to show that objections were made. Hosford v. Stone, 6 Neb. 378 (1877).